Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 10
ADVERTISING

5-10-1001. Advertising.

An advertisement for a rental purchase agreement shall not state or imply that a specific item is available at specific amounts or terms unless the lessor usually and customarily offers or will offer that item at those amounts or terms.

If any advertisement for a rental purchase agreement refers to or states the amount of any payment or the right to acquire ownership for a specific item, the advertisement must also clearly and conspicuously state the following terms as applicable:

That the transaction is a rental purchase agreement or rent-to-own agreement;

The total number of payments and amount of such payments necessary to acquire ownership; and

That the lessee will not own the property until the total of such payments is paid in full or is paid by prepayment.

Advertising which complies with the "Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act" does not violate this section.

With the exception of the lessor, this section imposes no liability on the owner or personnel of any medium in which an advertisement appears or through which it is disseminated.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 378, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.